North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 25A. Unified Licenses.

§ 113-351.
Unified hunting and fishing licenses; subsistence license waiver.

Definitions. — The definitions set out in

G.S. 113-174

apply to this Article.

General Provisions Governing Licenses and Waivers. — The general provisions governing licenses set out in

G.S. 113-174.1

apply to licenses and waivers issued under this section.

Types of Unified Hunting and Fishing Licenses; Fees; Duration. — The Wildlife Resources Commission shall issue the following Unified Hunting and Fishing Licenses:

Annual Resident Unified Sportsman/Coastal Recreational Fishing License. — $65.00. This license is valid from the date of issue for a period of 12 months as defined by

G.S. 113-270.1

B(b) and

G.S. 113-270.1

B(c). This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State. This license authorizes the licensee to take all wild animals and wild birds, including waterfowl, by all lawful methods in all open seasons, including the use of game lands; to fish with hook and line for all fish in all inland fishing waters and joint fishing waters, including public mountain trout waters; and to engage in recreational fishing in coastal fishing waters.

Annual Resident Unified Inland/Coastal Recreational Fishing License. — $40.00. This license is valid from the date of issue for a period of 12 months as defined by G.S. 113-270.1B(b) and G.S. 113-270.1B(c). This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State. This license authorizes the licensee to fish with hook and line for all fish in all inland fishing waters and joint fishing waters, including public mountain trout waters, and to engage in recreational fishing in coastal fishing waters.

Lifetime Unified Sportsman/Coastal Recreational Fishing Licenses. — A license issued under this subdivision is valid for the lifetime of the licensee. A license issued under this subdivision authorizes the licensee to take all wild animals and wild birds, including waterfowl, by all lawful methods in all open seasons, including the use of game lands; to fish with hook and line for all fish in all inland fishing waters and joint fishing waters, including public mountain trout waters; and to engage in recreational fishing in coastal fishing waters. [The licenses are as follows:]

Infant Lifetime Unified Sportsman/Coastal Recreational Fishing License. — $275.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is younger than one year of age.

Youth Lifetime Unified Sportsman/Coastal Recreational Fishing License. — $450.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is one year of age or older but younger than 12 years of age.

Resident Adult Lifetime Unified Sportsman/Coastal Recreational Fishing License. — $675.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual resident of the State who is 12 years of age or older but younger than 70 years of age. Except for individuals qualifying for a discounted license pursuant to G.S. 113-276(o), a resident who is 50 years of age or older but younger than 70 years of age shall be eligible to purchase this license at fifty percent (50%) of the applicable fee.

Nonresident Adult Lifetime Unified Sportsman/Coastal Recreational Fishing License. — $1,550. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is 12 years of age or older and who is not a resident of the State.

Resident Age 70 Lifetime Unified Sportsman/Coastal Recreational Fishing License. — $30.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is 70 years of age or older and who is a resident of the State.

Resident Disabled Veteran Lifetime Unified Sportsman/Coastal Recreational Fishing License. — $110.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State and who is a fifty percent (50%) or more disabled veteran as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or as established by rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Resident Totally Disabled Lifetime Unified Sportsman/Coastal Recreational Fishing License. — $110.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State and who is totally and permanently disabled as determined by the Social Security Administration or as established by rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Lifetime Unified Inland/Coastal Recreational Fishing Licenses. — Except as provided in sub-subdivisions b. and c. of this subdivision, a license issued under this subdivision is valid for the lifetime of the licensee. A license issued under this subdivision authorizes the licensee to fish with hook and line for all fish in all inland fishing waters and joint fishing waters, including public mountain trout waters, and to engage in recreational fishing in coastal fishing waters. [The licenses are as follows:]

Resident Lifetime Unified Inland/Coastal Recreational Fishing License. — $450.00.

Resident Legally Blind Lifetime Unified Inland/Coastal Recreational Fishing License. — No charge. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State and who has been certified by the Department of Health and Human Services as an individual whose vision with glasses is insufficient for use in ordinary occupations for which sight is essential. This license remains valid for the lifetime of the licensee so long as the licensee remains legally blind.

Resident Adult Care Home Lifetime Unified Inland/Coastal Recreational Fishing License. — No charge. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State and who resides in an adult care home as defined in

G.S. 131D-2.1

or G.S. 131E-101(1). This license remains valid for the lifetime of the licensee so long as the licensee remains a resident of an adult care home.

Resident Subsistence Unified Inland/Coastal Recreational Fishing License Waiver. — A county department of social services shall issue a Resident Subsistence Unified Inland/Coastal Recreational Fishing License Waiver to an individual who receives benefits from Medicaid, Food and Nutrition Services, or Work First Family Assistance through the county department of social services and who requests a waiver. This waiver shall be issued at no charge. This waiver is valid for a period of one year from the date of issuance. This waiver shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State. This waiver authorizes the waiver holder to fish with hook and line for all fish in all inland fishing waters and joint fishing waters, except for public mountain trout waters, and to engage in recreational fishing in coastal fishing waters. County departments of social services shall supply the Wildlife Resources Commission with the name, mailing address, and telephone number of each individual who receives a waiver.

History.

2005-455, s. 1.16; 2006-79, s. 2; 2006-255, s. 10; 2007-97, s. 14; 2009-462, s. 4(e); 2013-283, s. 10; 2014-100, s. 14.25(d); 2019-204, s. 4; 2021-160, s. 8(b).

Cross References.

As to adoption of rules establishing fees for hunting, fishing, trapping and activity licenses issued and administered by the Wildlife Resources Commission, see

G.S. 113-270.1

B(e).

§§ 113-352 through 113-377.

Reserved for future codification purposes.